Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2758
State funds; use; limitations.

(1) If funds are appropriated, the department may provide state funds for certain activities or any portion thereof in connection with the implementation of the Scrapie Control and Eradication Act to or on behalf of flock owners if funds for any activities or any portion thereof have been appropriated and are available. If funds are appropriated, the department shall develop statewide priorities for the expenditure of state funds available for scrapie control and eradication program activities.

(2) Part of such state funds may be used by the department to pay a portion of the cost of testing done by or for accredited veterinarians if such work is approved by the department. All of such testing shall be performed by or under the direct supervision of the accredited veterinarian, except that nothing in this subsection shall restrict an employee of the state or federal government in the performance of such employee's duties under the act or federal law.

(3) In administering the act and program activities pursuant thereto, the department shall not pay for (a) testing done for change of ownership at private treaty or at concentration points, (b) costs of gathering, confining, and restraining animals subjected to testing or costs of providing necessary facilities and assistance, and (c) the cost of testing to qualify or maintain flock certification.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 58.